Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.15.050

Effect of disincorporation—Powers—Offices.

The effect of disincorporation of a noncharter code city shall be as provided in RCW 35.07.090, 35.07.100, and 35.07.110.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.15.050.]